Hawaii statutes.
§189-24 Functions, powers, and duties of
director. In the performance of, and with respect to, the functions,
powers, and duties vested in the director by this part, the director shall:

(1) Prescribe the qualifications for eligibility of
applicants for loans and, in so doing, be guided by requirements as set forth
in Public Law 88-498.

(2) Establish preferences and priorities in
determining eligibility for loans.

(3) Establish the conditions, consistent with the
purposes of this part, for the granting of the loan.

(4) Provide for inspection, at reasonable hours, of
the vessel, books, and records of an individual or enterprise who has applied
for or has been granted a loan and to require the submission of progress and
final reports.

(5) Adopt rules and regulations under chapter 91 to
carry out this part. [L 1965, c 193, §5; Supp, §21-104; HRS §189-24; am L 1968,
c 28, §2; am L 1975, c 167, pt of §4; am L 1976, c 70, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next